Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3338
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a determination of the department under sections 43-3328 to 43-3339, upon exhaustion of the procedures for administrative review provided in such sections, or the department may seek judicial review in the court in which the support order was issued or registered.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 38;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 168.